Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.730

State building code council and director of fire protection—Implementation and enforcement.

The state building code council shall work in conjunction with the director of fire protection to coordinate the implementation and enforcement of RCW 19.27.710 and 19.27.720.

[ 2020 c 88 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 88: See note following RCW 19.27.700.